Utah statutes.
53-13-112.   Auxiliary officer.

(1)  An auxiliary officer is a specific category of special function officer and is required to have the level of training of a special function officer as provided in Section 53-13-105, including no fewer than 40 hours per year of in-service training.

(2)  An auxiliary officer:

(a)  shall work under the direction and immediate supervision of a certified law enforcement officer as defined in Section 53-13-103;

(b)  is limited to the role of back-up officer to a law enforcement officer;

(c)  may not initiate any action authorized for a law enforcement officer in Section 53-13-103; and

(d)  may be separated from a law enforcement officer only under exigent circumstances or when engaged in functions not exclusive to law enforcement, which functions are defined by the division by rule.



Enacted by Chapter 92, 1999 General Session

